Utah statutes.
34A-1-104.   Commission authority.

Within all other authority or responsibility granted to it by law, the commission may:

(1)  adopt rules when authorized by this title, or Title 34, Labor in General, in accordance with the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(2)  conduct adjudicative proceedings in accordance with the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(3)  license agencies in accordance with this title or Title 34, Labor in General;

(4)  employ and determine the compensation of clerical, legal, technical, investigative, and other employees necessary to carry out its policymaking, regulatory, and enforcement powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities under this title or Title 34, Labor in General;

(5)  administer and enforce all laws for the protection of the life, health, and safety, of employees;

(6)  ascertain and fix reasonable standards, and prescribe, modify, and enforce reasonable orders, for the adoption of safety devices, safeguards, and other means or methods of protection, to be as nearly uniform as possible, as necessary to carry out all laws and lawful orders relative to the protection of the life, health, and safety, of employees in employment and places of employment;

(7)  ascertain, fix, and order reasonable standards for the construction, repair, and maintenance of places of employment as shall make them safe;

(8)  investigate, ascertain, and determine reasonable classifications of persons, employments, and places of employment as necessary to carry out the purposes of this title or Title 34, Labor in General;

(9)  promote the voluntary arbitration, mediation, and conciliation of disputes between employers and employees;

(10)  ascertain and adopt reasonable standards and rules, prescribe and enforce reasonable orders, and take other actions appropriate for the protection of life, health, and safety of all persons with respect to all prospects, tunnels, pits, banks, open cut workings, quarries, strip mine operations, ore mills, and surface operations or any other mining operation, whether or not the relationship of employer and employee exists, but the commission may not assume jurisdiction or authority over adopted standards and regulations or perform any mining inspection or enforcement of mining rules and regulations so long as Utah's mining operations are governed by federal regulations;

(11)  develop processes to ensure that the commission responds to the full range of employee and employer clients; and

(12)  carry out the responsibilities assigned to it by statute.

